Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202118-2506
Measure, defined.

Measure means an ordinance, charter provision, or resolution which is within the legislative authority of the governing body of a municipality to pass and which is not excluded from the operation of referendum by the exceptions in section 18-2528. Measure does not include any action permitted by the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act.

Laws 1982, LB 807, § 6;

Laws 1984, LB 1010, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 36;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 169.

Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment Act, see section 77-1001.